Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-728
Public improvements; city engineer; inspection and acceptance.

When any public improvement is completed according to contract, it shall be the duty of the city engineer to carefully inspect the same, and if the improvement is found to be properly done, such engineer shall accept the same and forthwith report his acceptance thereof to the council with recommendation that the same be approved or disapproved, and the city council may confirm or reject such acceptance. When the ordinance levying the tax makes the same due as the improvement is completed in front of or along any block or piece of ground, the engineer may accept the same in sections from time to time, if found to be done according to the contract, reporting his acceptance as in other cases.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 105, p. 111;

R.S.1913, § 4538;

C.S.1922, § 3924;

C.S.1929, § 15-717;

R.S.1943, § 15-728.